src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s30x6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - varða: # 
    varða+V+Inf: varða
    varða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [varðar, varðir]
    varða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [vardaði, vardi]
    varða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [vardaðu, vardu]
    varða+V+Sup: [vardað, vart]
    varða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [vardaður, vardur]
